California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(a) There is an imperative need for comprehensive planning and implementation of regional transportation projects in the San Diego region. Diminution of congestion on the streets and highways in the San Diego region will facilitate passage of all Californians traveling through San Diego, and especially benefit persons who live or work in San Diego County who must commute to points within and outside the San Diego region on a daily basis.

(b) Several separate limited-purpose transportation agencies have been established in the San Diego region, however, the San Diego region would benefit from coordinated and comprehensive planning by these agencies.

(c) In view of the limited powers of the San Diego Association of Governments (SANDAG), to provide the needed comprehensive transportation planning and implementation without consolidation of certain responsibilities of the transit boards, the Legislature finds that consolidation of the planning, programming, project development, and construction activities of various transportation agencies in the San Diego region will improve the efficiency and effectiveness of implementing needed transportation infrastructure and services and provide for a focus on meeting the mobility needs of the region.

(d) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to consolidate SANDAG and certain responsibilities of the transit boards to provide for sufficient power and authority to solve the transportation problems in the San Diego region and the needed comprehensive transportation system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132350.2.

For purposes of this chapter, the definitions contained in this section have the following meanings:

(a) “Consolidated agency” means the authority resulting from the consolidation of SANDAG and the transit boards’ responsibilities as set forth herein.

(b) “Consolidated entities” means SANDAG and the transit boards as set forth in Article 4 (commencing with Section 132353).

(c) “Population” means that population of any agency last determined for the agency as certified by the Department of Finance as of April 1 of each year, or if no certification has been made, the last Federal Decennial Census, except that the population of San Diego County shall be that population determined in the same manner for the unincorporated area of the county. The population of the region shall be that population determined by adding the population of each agency.

(d) “North county coastal” means the Cities of Del Mar, Solana Beach, Encinitas, Carlsbad, and Oceanside.

(e) “North county inland” means the Cities of Vista, San Marcos, Escondido, and Poway.

(f) “South county” means the Cities of Chula Vista, National City, Imperial Beach, and Coronado.

(g) “East county” means the Cities of El Cajon, Santee, La Mesa, and Lemon Grove.

(h) “San Diego region” means the territory located within the boundaries of San Diego County.

(i) “Transit boards” means the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board (MTDB) and the North San Diego County Transit Development Board (NCTD).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Organization and Governance [132351. - 132351.6.]

132351.

The consolidation of SANDAG and the transit boards will consolidate responsibilities under the organization and governance structure and with the powers, duties, functions, and authority as set forth herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132351.1.

(a) A board of directors consisting of 21 members shall govern the consolidated agency.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “governing body” means the board of supervisors, council, council and mayor where the mayor is not a member of the council, authority, trustees, director, commission, committee, or other policymaking body, as appropriate, that exercises authority over an entity represented on the board of the consolidated agency.

(c) All powers, privileges, and duties vested in or imposed upon the consolidated agency shall be exercised and performed by and through a board of directors provided, however, that the exercise of all executive, administrative,
 and ministerial power may be delegated and redelegated by the board, to any of the offices, officers, or committees created pursuant to this chapter or created by the board acting pursuant to this chapter.

(d) The board shall be composed of one primary representative selected by the governing body of each city in the county and a member of the San Diego County Board of Supervisors. However, the City of San Diego and the County of San Diego shall each have a primary and secondary representative, which for the City of San Diego shall be the mayor of the City of San Diego and the president of the city council. Each director shall be a mayor, councilperson, or supervisor, as applicable, of the governing body that selected him or her, and shall serve until recalled by the governing body of the city or county. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as originally selected. Each city or county shall also select one alternate to serve on the board
 when the primary or secondary representative, if applicable, is not available. The alternate shall be subject to the same restrictions and have the same powers, when serving on the board, as the representative for whom he or she is substituting. The alternate shall be a mayor, councilperson, or supervisor, as applicable, of his or her governing body.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), in those years when the primary representative of the San Diego County Board of Supervisors is from a district that is substantially an incorporated area, a supervisor who represents a district that is substantially an unincorporated area shall be appointed to the board as the secondary representative. Alternatively, in those years when the primary representative of the San Diego County Board of Supervisors is from a district that is substantially an unincorporated area, a supervisor who represents a district that is substantially an incorporated area shall be
 appointed to the board as the secondary representative.

(f) At its discretion, each city or county may select a second alternate, in the same manner as the first alternate, to serve on the board in the event that neither the primary representative nor the first alternate is able to attend a meeting of the board. This alternate shall be subject to the same restrictions and have the same powers, when serving on the board, as the primary representative.

(g) The board may allow for the appointment of advisory representatives to sit with the board but in no event shall those representatives be allowed a vote. The current advisory representatives to the San Diego Association of Governments may continue their advisory representation on the consolidated agency at the discretion of their governing body. The governing bodies of the County of Imperial and the cities in that county may
 collectively designate an advisory representative to sit with the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 658, Sec. 11.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

132351.2.

(a) A majority of the member agencies constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In order to act on any item, the affirmative vote of the majority of the members of the board present is required. However, after a vote of the members is taken, a weighted vote may be called by the members of any two jurisdictions.

(b) The governing body of the City of San Diego and the County of San Diego shall allocate their weighted votes equally between their primary and secondary members.

(c) For the weighted vote, there shall be a total of 100 votes, except additional votes shall be allowed pursuant to subdivision (h). Each member agency shall have that number of
 votes determined by the following apportionment formula, provided that each agency shall have at least one vote, no agency shall have more than 50 votes, and there shall be no fractional votes:

(1) If any agency has 50 percent or more of the total population of the San Diego County region, allocate 50 votes to that agency and follow paragraph (2), and if not, follow paragraph (3).

(2) Total the population of the remaining agencies determined in paragraph (1) and compute the percentage of this total that each agency has.

(A) Multiply each percentage derived above by 50 to determine fractional shares.

(B) Boost fractions that are less than one to one and add the whole numbers.

(C) If the
 answer to subparagraph (B) is 50, drop all fractions and the whole numbers are the votes for each agency.

(D) If the answer to subparagraph (B) is less than 50, the remaining vote is allocated one each to the agency having the highest fraction excepting those whose vote was increased to one pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(E) If the answer to subparagraph (B) is more than 50, the excess vote is taken one each from the agency with the lowest fraction. In no case shall a vote be reduced to less than one.

(3) Total the population determined in paragraph (1) and compute the percentage of this total that each agency has.

(A) Boost fractions that are less than one to one and add the whole numbers.

(B) If the answer to subparagraph (A) is 100, drop all fractions and the whole numbers are the votes for each agency.

(C) If the answer to subparagraph (A) is less than 100, the remaining vote is allocated one each to the agency having the highest fraction excepting those whose vote was increased to one pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(D) If the answer to subparagraph (A) is more than 100, the excess vote is taken one each from the agency with the lowest fraction. In no case shall a vote be reduced to less than one.

(d) When a weighted vote is taken on any item that requires more than a majority vote of the board, it shall also require the supermajority percentage of the weighted vote.

(e) Approval under the weighted vote procedure requires
 the vote of not less than four members representing separate jurisdictions and not less than 51 percent of the total weighted vote to supersede the original action of the board.

(f) For purposes of subdivision (c), the population of the County of San Diego is the population in the unincorporated area of the county.

(g) The weighted vote formula under subdivision (c) shall be recomputed every July 1.

(h) Any newly incorporated city shall receive one vote under the weighted vote procedure until the next recomputation of the weighted vote formula under subdivision (c), at which time the new agency shall receive votes in accordance with the recomputed formula. Until this recomputation, the total weighted vote may exceed 100.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 658, Sec. 12.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

132351.3.

The consolidated agency is the successor agency to the San Diego Association of Governments (SANDAG) and those entities set forth in Article 4 (commencing with Section 132353). The consolidated agency is a statutorily created regional transportation planning agency under Section 29532.1 of the Government Code. As the successor to SANDAG, the consolidated agency succeeds to, continues, and maintains SANDAG’s federal, state and local designations, including, but not limited to, designation as the Metropolitan Planning Organization, is the San Diego County Regional Transportation Commission pursuant to Section 132005, is the congestion management agency, and is the council of governments for the San Diego region.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132351.4.

(a) The consolidated agency shall have five standing policy advisory committees named the executive, transportation, regional planning, borders, and audit committees. The responsibilities of the committees shall be established by the board. Committee membership may be expanded by the consolidated agency, and shall be selected in accordance with a process established by the consolidated agency. The membership shall be as follows:

(1) The executive committee shall consist of six voting members with board members representing east county, north county coastal, north county inland, south county, and the representative, or the representative’s alternate in their absence, from the City
 of San Diego and the county. The chairperson and the vice chairperson of the consolidated agency shall each be one of the six voting members.

(2) (A) The transportation committee shall consist of 10 voting members with board members or alternates representing east county, north county coastal, north county inland, south county and the mayor or a council member from the City of San Diego, a supervisor from the County of San Diego, a member of the board of the MTDB appointed by the board of the MTDB, a member of the board of the NCTD appointed by the board of the NCTD, a member of the governing board of the San Diego Unified Port District appointed by the board of the port, and a member of the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority appointed by the airport authority.

(B) Among its transportation responsibilities, the transportation committee shall provide a strong focus and commitment to meeting the public transit needs of the San Diego region, set transit funding criteria and recommend transit funding levels, and undertake transit responsibilities resulting from consolidation, as delegated by the board.

(C) The board shall provide a report, developed by the transportation committee, to the Legislature on or before December 31 of each year that outlines the public transit needs, transit funding criteria, recommended transit funding levels, and additional work on public transit, as delegated to the transportation committee by the board. The report shall specify the funds spent explicitly on public transportation. The report shall be submitted consistent with Section 9795 of the Government
 Code.

(3) The regional planning committee shall consist of six voting members with board members or alternates representing east county, north county coastal, north county inland, south county, and the mayor or a council member from the City of San Diego, and a supervisor from the County of San Diego.

(4) The borders committee shall consist of seven voting members with board members or alternates representing east county, north county coastal, north county inland, south county, the mayor or a council member from the City of San Diego, a supervisor from the County of San Diego, and a mayor, council member, or supervisor from the County of Imperial.

(5) The audit committee shall consist of five voting members with
 two board members and three members of the public to be appointed by the board. The audit committee shall recommend to the board the contract of the firm conducting the annual financial
 statement audits and the hiring of the independent performance auditor and approve the annual audit plan after discussion with the independent performance auditor pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 132354.1.

(b) The board may appoint other standing and ad hoc working groups to advise it in carrying out its responsibilities.

(c) No board member may serve as a member of more than two standing policy advisory committees at any one time, except those board members serving on the audit committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 219, Sec. 2.   (SB 891)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

132351.5.

(a) Each member of the consolidated agency, including alternate members when serving in the absence of a regular member at board meetings, and members, including alternates, of the policy advisory committees of the consolidated agency, shall be compensated as determined by the board, and for his or her necessary and reasonable expenses in performing his or her duties as a consolidated agency or policy advisory committee member.

(b) The chairperson shall receive additional monthly compensation in an amount established from time to time by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132351.6.

District 11 of the Department of Transportation shall coordinate with the consolidated agency on transportation planning for all projects within the jurisdiction of the consolidated agency in which the department and the consolidated agency have common planning or programming responsibilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Administration [132352. - 132352.5.]

132352.

(a) The consolidated agency may adopt bylaws and other rules necessary to carry out its responsibilities.

(b) The clerk of the board shall cause a proposed ordinance or proposed amendment to an ordinance, and any ordinance adopted by the board, to be published at least once, in a newspaper of general circulation published and circulated in the board’s area of jurisdiction.

(c) The publication of an ordinance, as required by subdivision (b), may be satisfied by either of the following actions:

(1) The board may publish a summary of a proposed ordinance or proposed amendment to an ordinance. The summary shall be prepared by a person designated by the board. The summary shall be published and a certified copy of the full text of the proposed ordinance or proposed amendment shall be posted in the office of the clerk of the board at least five days prior to the board meeting at which the proposed ordinance or amendment is to be adopted. Within 15 days after adoption of the ordinance or amendment, the board shall publish a summary of the ordinance or amendment with the names of those board members voting for and against the ordinance or amendment and the clerk shall post in the office of the clerk a certified copy of the full text of the adopted ordinance or amendment along with the names of those board members voting for and against the ordinance or amendment.

(2) If the person designated by the board determine that it is not feasible to prepare a fair and adequate summary of the proposed ordinance or amendment, and if the board so orders, a display advertisement of at least one-quarter of a page in a newspaper of general circulation in the board’s area of jurisdiction shall be published at least five days prior to the board meeting at which the proposed ordinance or amendment is to be adopted. Within 15 days after adoption of the ordinance or amendment, a display advertisement of at least one-quarter of a page shall be published. The advertisement shall indicate the general nature of, and provide information regarding, the adopted ordinance or amendment, including information sufficient to enable the public to obtain copies of the complete text of the ordinance or amendment, and the names of those board members voting for and against the ordinance or amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 36.1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

132352.1.

All meetings of the consolidated agency, including, but not limited to, adjourned regular and special meetings of the board, shall be called, noticed, held, and conducted in accordance with the provisions of the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). Ten members of the board shall constitute a quorum for transaction of the business of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132352.2.

Acts of the board shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132352.3.

The officers of the board are the chairperson and the vice chairperson. The chairperson and vice chairperson shall be elected by the membership of the board every two years or when a vacancy exists, by means of the weighted vote pursuant to Section 132351.2. The chairperson and vice chairperson shall not represent the same subregion, with the subregions being east county, north county coastal, north county inland, south county, the City of San Diego, and the County of San Diego. The board may create additional officers and elect members to those positions. However, no member may hold more than one office. The term of office for any officers of the board other than the chairperson and the vice chairperson shall be established by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 658, Sec. 14.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

132352.4.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that there is a compelling interest in ensuring that all federal, state, local, and private funds available to the consolidated agency are captured and used in a timely manner. In order to maximize the use of federal, state, local, and private funds and to maintain a competitive posture in seeking supplemental federal funds, the consolidated agency may establish and use a flexible contracting process to maximize efficient use of public funds.

(b) The consolidated agency
 may do any of the following with regard to contracting:

(1) The consolidated agency may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and hold harmless, and to do all acts necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this chapter.

(2) The consolidated agency may contract with any department or agency of the United States or the State of California, local governmental authorities within or outside of the region, including those in Mexico, or any city, county, public district, public corporation, or joint powers authority formed pursuant to the 
 Joint Exercise of Powers Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code) upon those terms and conditions as the consolidated agency finds are for the best interests of the consolidated agency.

(3) If the estimated total cost of any construction project or public works project will exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the consolidated agency shall solicit bids in writing and shall award the work to the lowest responsible bidder or reject all bids. The consolidated agency shall establish rules for procurement of construction of public works projects.

(4) Except in cases when an article of a specified brand or trade name is the only article that will properly meet the needs of the consolidated agency, all
 contracts for the acquisition or lease of materials, supplies, or equipment in an amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), or a higher amount as authorized by the board, shall be made or entered into with the lowest responsible bidder meeting specifications. For purposes of determining the lowest bid, the amount of sales tax shall be excluded from the total amount of the bid.

(5) If the estimated total cost of required services equals or exceeds
 one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), the services will not be performed by an entity described in paragraph (2), and the services are not within the category of services defined in Section 4525 of the Government Code, the consolidated agency shall solicit bids in writing and shall award the work in a competitive procurement process that is in the best interest of the consolidated agency.

(6) Contracts for architectural, landscape architectural, engineering, environmental, land surveying services, and construction project management services 
 in excess of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) shall be let in accordance with Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4525) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(7) Notwithstanding this chapter, the consolidated agency may use any procurement method authorized for state or local agencies by state or federal law, including, but not limited to, use of a competitive negotiation process in accordance with Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 20216) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. The consolidated agency shall maintain acquisition and contracting guidelines to be followed by the consolidated agency with respect to procurement of goods and services. These guidelines may be in the form of standard formats or model formats.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 110, Sec. 3.   (AB 1833)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

132352.5.

(a) All of the privileges and immunities from liability, exemptions from laws, ordinances and rules, all pension, relief, disability, workers’ compensation, and other benefits that apply to the activity of officers, agents, or employees of a public agency when performing their respective functions shall apply to employees of the consolidated agency.

(b) All claims for money or damages against the consolidated agency or its employees shall be governed by Part 1 (commencing with Section 810), Part 2 (commencing with Section 814), Part 3 (commencing with Section 900), and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code applicable to public agencies and their employees, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Consolidation [132353. - 132353.4.]

132353.

Definitions. The following definitions contained in this article shall govern the construction of this article.

(a) “Construction” shall mean the final design, permitting and building of all transit projects including, but not limited to, commuter and freight rail, light rail, general rail infrastructure, regional bus facilities, paratransit, and other regional transit projects. Construction shall exclude the Oceanside to Escondido Rail Project and the Mission Valley East Extension Light Rail Project, and other projects or those portions of projects which have a construction contract in place at the time of the subsequent transfer defined in Section 132353.2. The aforementioned construction contracts may be assigned to the consolidated agency with mutual agreement of the consolidated agency and the respective transit board. Construction projects shall exclude local and minor improvement projects as defined in the transition plan.

(b) “Planning” shall include, but not be limited to, conceptual development of transit projects and services and integration and coordination of all modes of transportation.

(c) “Programming” shall mean the, acquisition, prioritization and allocation of funding of transit projects and services.

(d) “Project development” shall mean alternative analysis, environmental review and clearance, preliminary engineering, and any other activities necessary to prepare for the construction of a transit project, as defined in the transition plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132353.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law and except as provided in this chapter, the San Diego Association of Governments shall be consolidated into a public agency known as the consolidated agency. In addition, upon adoption of the 2030 Regional Transportation Plan by the consolidated agency, and not later than July 1, 2003, all public transit and other transportation planning and programming responsibilities, including, but not limited to, short and near-term operational and financial planning and program development of the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board (MTDB) and the North San Diego County Transit Development Board (NCTD), except as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 132353.2 shall be consolidated into the consolidated agency. This consolidation shall be referred to as the initial transfer. A transition plan for the initial transfer of transit functions and responsibilities shall be developed by February 28, 2003, by the consolidated agency in consultation with the transit boards to ensure the efficient and timely transfer of the transit boards’ functions and responsibilities. All local, state, federal, and other funding available to carry out these responsibilities and those set forth in Section 132353.2, upon any consolidation, shall be deemed to be funding of the consolidated agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132353.2.

(a) A transition plan for the transfer of project development and construction responsibilities of the transit boards and the financial resources therefore to the consolidated agency shall be developed by the consolidated agency in consultation with the transit boards to ensure the efficient and timely transfer of the transit boards’ project development and construction functions and responsibilities to the consolidated agency no later than September 30, 2003. The transfer and consolidation of project development and construction functions and responsibilities and the funding therefore shall occur no later than January 30, 2004, and shall be referred to as the subsequent transfer.

(b) The transition plans should define the functional roles and responsibilities of the consolidated agency and the transit boards and should define, in the applicable transition plan, service and operational planning, programming, project development, and construction. The transition plans should acknowledge a strong linkage between service planning and operations scheduling.

(c) Local route planning and scheduling and local financial planning therefor, would continue to be the responsibility of the transit boards in accordance with guidelines provided by the consolidated agency. The initial transition plan would include the development of guidelines and would define local route planning.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 132353.2, at any time after the initial transfer, the consolidated agency may enter into individual agreements with the MTDB or the NCTD for the transfer and consolidation of any or all functions, personnel, and funding of either agency, except those functions set forth in Section 132354.5, to the consolidated agency on terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed upon.

(e) The MTDB and the NCTD shall continue to be a claimant, applicant, and grantee of local, state, and federal grants until the transfer and consolidation of functions or responsibilities to the consolidated agency pursuant to a transition plan at which time the consolidated agency shall become the claimant, applicant, and grantee for these funds. Except for funds which are transferred to the consolidated agency pursuant to a transition plan, the MTDB and the NCTD shall continue to receive funding pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260) and Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 99275) of the Transportation Development Act in Chapter 4 of Part 11 of Division 10 and the State Transportation Assistance Fund in accordance with state law. Except for funds which are transferred to the consolidated agency pursuant to a transition plan, the MTDB and the NCTD shall continue to receive the Federal Section 5307 Urbanized Area Formula funds pursuant to federal statute. These funds should be allocated in a manner which will help enable the transit boards to meet their obligations and responsibilities recognizing the methodology and historic funding levels that have previously guided these funding decisions. The consolidated agency shall conduct a periodic review of the allocation and methodology for all formula-based funding.

(f) The consolidated agency and the MTDB and the NCTD shall work together to obtain funds for transit projects and services.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that future consolidation of transit operations of the MTDB and the NCTD into the consolidated agency should be comprehensively evaluated by the consolidated agency. This consolidation shall be referred to as a complete consolidation and shall be implemented only if it is considered to be appropriate by the consolidated agency and approved by a statute enacted by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 267.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

132353.3.

In the event of complete consolidation of MTDB with the consolidated agency, any corporation that is a wholly owned subsidiary of MTDB shall become a subsidiary of the consolidated agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132353.4.

Upon the transfer of responsibilities and obligations from the consolidated entities into the consolidated agency, the consolidated agency, shall by operation of law, and in accordance with transition plans, succeed to all of the rights and obligations of the consolidated entities, including MTDB and NCTD, which enable the consolidated agency to perform the responsibility and obligations transferred, as provided in this section. This shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) The rights and property of the consolidated entities, including MTDB and NCTD, pertaining to the responsibilities and obligations transferred.

(b) The legally enforceable debts and liabilities of the consolidated entities, including MTDB and NCTD, pertaining to the responsibilities and obligations transferred in the same manner as if the consolidated agency had itself incurred them.

(c) The rights of creditors and all liens upon the property of the consolidated entities or of their responsibilities shall be preserved unimpaired, limited in lien to the property affected by the liens immediately prior to the transfer of related responsibilities and obligations.

(d) An action or proceeding pending by or against a consolidated entity, including MTDB and NCTD, may be prosecuted to judgment, and the judgment shall be binding on the consolidated agency, or the consolidated agency may be proceeded against or substituted in the place of a consolidated entity, if the action or proceeding pertains to a transferred responsibility or obligation.

(e) In order to protect the holders of outstanding, unmatured bonds and other evidences of indebtedness of the consolidated entities, including MTDB and NCTD pertaining to the responsibilities and obligations transferred, the consolidated agency shall have the power to take all actions and do all things necessary or required for the protection of those holders and for compliance with the terms of those bonds and other evidences of indebtedness. The consolidated agency shall have the power to continue all services that the consolidated entities, including MTDB and NCTD are furnishing pertaining to the responsibilities and obligations transferred on the date of the transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Powers and Functions [132354. - 132354.8.]

132354.

The consolidated agency shall have and may exercise all rights and powers, expressed or implied, that are necessary to carry out the purposes and intent of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the power to do all of the following:

(a) Sue and be sued.

(b) (1) To acquire any property by any means, and to hold, manage, occupy, develop, jointly develop, dispose of, convey, or encumber property.

(2) To create a leasehold interest in property for the benefit of the consolidated agency.

(c) To acquire, by eminent domain, any property necessary to carry out any of its powers or functions.

(d) To merge or split parcels, adjust boundary lines, or take similar actions as part of the acquisition of land or as needed in order to carry out its functions.

(e) To construct, acquire, develop, jointly develop, maintain, operate, lease, and dispose of work, property, rights-of-way, and facilities.

(f) To appoint necessary employees, including counsel, and to define their qualifications and duties.

(g) To enter into and perform all necessary contracts.

(h) To fix and collect fees for any services rendered by it.

(i) To adopt a seal and alter it at the consolidated agency’s pleasure.

(j) To adopt an annual budget and to fix the compensation of its officers, board members, and employees.

(k) To establish and enforce rules and regulations for the administration, operation, and maintenance of facilities and services.

(l) To enter joint powers arrangements with other entities.

(m) To provide insurance.

(n) To issue bonds.

(o) To do any other things necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132354.1.

(a) The board shall arrange for a post audit of the financial transactions and records of the consolidated agency to be made at least annually by a certified public accountant.

(b) (1) The audit committee shall appoint an independent performance auditor, subject to approval by the board, who may only be removed for cause by a vote of at least two-thirds of the audit committee and the board.

(2) The independent performance auditor shall have authority to conduct or to cause to be conducted performance audits of all departments, offices, boards, activities, agencies, and programs of the consolidated
 agency. The auditor shall prepare annually an audit plan and conduct audits in accordance therewith and perform those other duties as may be required by ordinance or as provided by the California Constitution and general laws of the state. The auditor shall follow government auditing standards. All officers and employees of the consolidated agency shall furnish to the auditor unrestricted access to employees, information, and records, including electronic data, within their custody regarding powers, duties, activities, organization, property, financial transactions, contracts, and methods of business required to conduct an audit or otherwise perform audit duties. It is also the duty of any consolidated agency officer, employee, or agent to fully cooperate with the auditor, and to make full disclosure of all pertinent information.

(3) The auditor shall have the power to appoint, employ, and remove assistants, employees, and personnel as deemed necessary for the efficient and effective administration of the affairs of the
 office and to prescribe their duties, scope of authority, and qualifications.
